District of Columbia statutes.
50-921.71

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“DC Streetcar” means a local fixed guideway transit network offering rail passenger service operated by the District government or its agent.

(2)

“DC Streetcar Fund” or “Fund” means the fund established by § 50-921.73.

(3)

“Ticket” includes a pass, token, or any other form of payment, including payments sold in bulk for resale, which may be used in lieu of cash.

May 21, 2002, D.C. Law 14-137, § 11m
as added Apr. 20, 2013, D.C. Law 19-268, § 3, 60 DCR 1709
This section is referenced in § 2-1831.03.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-268 added this section.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of D.C. Law 19-268, § 5, see § 6162 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).

D.C. Law 19-268, § 3, added Title V, consisting of §§ 11m to 11s, to D.C. Law 14-137.

Section 4 of D.C. Law 19-268 provided: “Comprehensive financing and governance plan. On or before December 31, 2013, the Mayor’s DC Streetcar Financing and Governance Task Force shall develop a comprehensive financing and governance plan for DC Streetcar, and shall transmit this plan to the Council.”

Section 5 of D.C. Law 19-268 provided that this subchapter shall expire as of September 30, 2015.

Section 5 of D.C. Law 19-268, as amended by D.C. Law 21-36, §§ 6162 and 6163, provided that this subchapter shall expire as of September 30, 2016.